Washington statutes.
RCW 39.62.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Public security" means a bond, note, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by this state or by any of its departments, agencies, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, junior taxing districts, school districts, or other instrumentalities or by any of its political subdivisions.

(2) "Instrument of payment" means a check, draft, warrant, or order for the payment, delivery, or transfer of funds.

(3) "Authorized officer" means any official of this state or any of its departments, agencies, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, junior taxing districts, school districts, or other instrumentalities or any of its political subdivisions whose signature to a public security or instrument of payment is required or permitted.

(4) "Facsimile signature" means a reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the manual signature of an authorized officer.

[ 1969 c 86 s 1.]